District of Columbia statutes.
11-2607

Preparation of budget.

The joint committee shall prepare and include in its annual budget requests for the District of Columbia court system estimates of the expenditures and appropriations necessary for furnishing representation by private attorneys to persons entitled to representation in accordance with section 2601 of this title [11-2601].

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1093, Pub. L. 93-412, § 2
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(123), 108 Stat. 713
Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 760, Pub. L. 105-033, § 11262(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-2607.
1973 Ed., § 11-2607.